Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 6. Truncation of Card Information.

Sec. 45.48.750.
Truncation of card information.

A person who accepts credit cards or debit cards for the transaction of business may not print more than the last four digits of the card number or the expiration date on any receipt or other physical record of the transaction provided at the point of the sale or transaction.

This section applies only to receipts that are electronically printed and does not apply to transactions in which the sole means of recording a credit card or debit card account number is by handwriting or by an imprint or copy of the card.

A person may not sell a device that electronically prints more than the last four digits of a credit card or debit card number or expiration date on a consumer receipt for a business transaction or on a copy retained by a business person for a business transaction.

An individual may bring a civil action in court against a person who knowingly violates (a) of this section and may recover actual economic damages, court costs allowed by the rules of court, and full reasonable attorney fees.

A person who knowingly violates this section is liable to the state for a civil penalty not to exceed $3,000.

In this section,

“credit” means the right granted by a creditor to a debtor to defer payment of debt, to incur debts and defer payment of the debt, or to purchase property or services and defer payment of the purchase; in this paragraph, “creditor” means a person who regularly extends, renews, or continues credit, a person who regularly arranges for the extension, renewal, or continuation of credit, or an assignee of an original creditor who participates in the decision to extend, renew, or continue credit;

“credit card” means a card, plate, coupon book, or other credit device existing for the purpose of obtaining money, property, labor, or services on credit;

“debit card” means a card issued by a financial institution to a consumer for use in initiating an electronic fund transfer from the account of the consumer at the financial institution for the purpose of transferring money between accounts or obtaining money, property, labor, or services;

“knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 92 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For the effect of (d) of this section on Rule 82, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, on criteria to be applied in the award of attorney fees, see § 6(b), ch. 92, SLA 2008 in the 2008 Temporary and Special Acts.